Utah statutes.
7-7-1.   Citation of chapter -- Application of Utah Revised Business
Corporation Act.
This chapter is known as the "Savings and Loan Associations Act." Except for
Sections 16-10a-122, 16-10a-820 through 16-10a-842, Title 16, Chapter 10a,
Utah Revised Business Corporation Act, does not apply to or govern any
association as defined in this chapter.
